ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 리넨 제품/침구 > 수건 > 목욕 타월/세안 타월: 목욕 타월; 세안 타월
ru: Дом и сад > Кухонный текстиль, постельные принадлежности и полотенца > Полотенца > Банные полотенца и махровые салфетки: Банные полотенца; Махровые салфетки
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 床上用品 > 毛巾 > 浴巾/毛巾: 浴巾; 洗脸巾
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Obliečky a posteľná bielizeň > Uteráky > Osušky a uteráky: Osušky; Uteráky
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Atoalhados e roupa de cama > Toalhas > Toalhas de banho e rosto: Toalhas de banho; Toalhas de rosto
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Liina- ja vuodevaatteet > Pyyhkeet > Kylpypyyhkeet ja liinat: Kylpypyyhkeet; Pesuliinat
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 床包被套 > 毛巾 > 浴巾和毛巾: 浴巾; 洗臉毛巾
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Λευκά είδη & κλινοσκεπάσματα > Πετσέτες > Πετσέτες & πετσετάκια μπάνιου: Πετσέτες μπάνιου; Πετσετάκια μπάνιου
pl: Dom i ogród > Bielizna stołowa i pościelowa > Ręczniki > Ręczniki kąpielowe i myjki: Ręczniki kąpielowe; Ściereczki do prania
de: Heim & Garten > Bett- und Haushaltswäsche > Handtücher > Badhandtücher & Waschlappen: Badhandtücher; Waschlappen
it: Casa e giardino > Biancheria > Teli per bagno > Asciugamani e salviette da bagno: Asciugamani da bagno; Washcloths
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Yatak Çarşaf ve Nevresimleri > Havlular > Banyo Havluları ve Sabunluklar: Banyo Havluları; Sabunluklar
en: Home & Garden > Linens & Bedding > Towels > Bath Towels & Washcloths: Bath Towels; Washcloths
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Posteljina i krevetnina > Ručnici > Ručnici i krpice za umivanje: Kupaonski ručnici; Krpice za umivanje
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Домашен текстил и спално бельо > Хавлиени кърпи > Хавлиени кърпи за баня и кърпи за миене: Хавлиени кърпи за баня; Кърпи за миене
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > テーブルリネン・寝具 > タオル > バスリネン: バスタオル; ボディタオル
da: Hjem og have > Linned og sengetøj > Håndklæder > Badehåndlæder og vaskeklude: Badehåndklæder; Vaskeklude
hu: Otthon és kert > Textíliák és ágyneműk > Törölközők > Fürdőszobai törölközők és mosókendők: Fürdő törölközők; Mosókendők
th: บ้านและสวน > ผ้าปูที่นอนและของใช้บนเตียง > ผ้าขนหนู > ผ้าเช็ดตัวและผ้าขนหนู: ผ้าขนหนูอาบน้ำ; ผ้าเช็ดตัว
es: Casa y jardín > Ropa de casa > Toallas > Toallas de baño y manoplas: Toallas de baño; Toallitas
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Posteljno perilo in posteljnina > Brisače > Kopalne brisače in krpe za umivanje: Kopalne brisače; Krpe za umivanje
fr: Maison et jardin > Linge > Serviettes > Serviettes de bain et gants de toilette: Serviettes de bain; Gants de toilette
vi: Nhà và vườn > Vải lanh và bộ đồ giường > Khăn tắm > Khăn mặt và khăn tắm: Khăn tắm; Khăn mặt
nb: Hjem og hage > Lakner og sengetøy > Håndklær > Badehåndklær og vaskekluter: Badehåndklær; Vaskekluter
cs: Dům a zahrada > Prádlo > Ručníky > Osušky a žínky: Osušky; Žínky
sv: Hem och trädgård > Linne och sängkläder > Handdukar > Badhanddukar och tvättlappar: Badlakan; Tvättlappar
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Lençóis e roupas de cama > Toalhas > Toalhas de banho e toalhinhas de lavabo: Toalhas de banho; Toalhinhas de lavabo
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Patalynė ir baltiniai > Rankšluosčiai > Vonios rankšluosčiai ir medžiaginės kempinės: Vonios rankšluosčiai; Medžiaginės kempinės
nl: Huis en tuin > Linnengoed > Handdoeken > Badhandboeken en washandjes: Badhanddoeken; Washandjes
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Articole textile și lenjerie de pat > Prosoape > Prosoape de baie și lavete pentru spălare: Prosoape de baie; Lavete pentru spălare